Utah statutes.
10-8-42.   Intoxicating liquors -- Prohibitions on manufacture, sale,
possession, etc.
They may prohibit, except as provided by law, any person from knowingly having
in his possession any intoxicating liquor, and the manufacture, sale, keeping
or storing for sale, offering or exposing for sale, importing, carrying,
transporting, advertising, distributing, giving away, exchanging, dispensing
or serving of intoxicating liquors.
